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DI3P6-01

DTC P0335/12, 13 Crankshaft Position Sensor Circuit
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The crankshaft position sensor, which detects the engine speed and crankshaft angle signal (NE signal),
has been installed on the oil pump body.

The NE signal plate has 34 teeth. The NE signal sensor generates 34 signals of every engine revolution.
The engine ECU detects the standard crankshaft angle based on the G2 signals, and the actual crankshaft
angle and the engine speed by the NE signals.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
No crankshaft position sensor signalto engine ECU during « Open orshortin crankshaft position sensor circuit
cranking « Crankshaft position sensas
P0335/12, 13 " , . .
No crankshaft position sensor signal to engine ECU with en- « Starter
gine speed 600 rpm or more *EngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

e Perform troubleshooting of DTC P0335/12, 13 first. If no trouble is found, troubleshoot the following
mechanical systems.
. Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.
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1 Check resistance of crankshaft position sensor (See page IG-1).
_ Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
G2, NE signal waveform 5V During cranking or idling, check between terminals G2 and
% Ffi : /Division| NE-,NEandNE - oftheengine ECU connector.
BN The correct waveforms are as shown.
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NG> Replace crankshaft position sensor.

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
crankshaft position sensor (See page IN-19).
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NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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3 |Inspect sensor installation and teeth of signal plate.

NG> Tighten sensor. Replace signal plate.

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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